Illinois, session 104th, SB3659.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by changing Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 10, 12, 614, 18, 20, and 23 and by adding Section 5.5 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 3305/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1051)8    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act may be cited as the Illinois 9Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency Act.10(Source: P.A. 87-168.) 11    (20 ILCS 3305/2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1052)12    Sec. 2. Policy and Purposes. 13    (a) Because of the possibility of the occurrence of 14disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting 15from the explosion in this or in neighboring states of atomic 16or other means from without or by means of sabotage or other 17disloyal actions within, or from fire, flood, earthquake, 18telecommunications failure, or other natural or technological 19causes, and in order to insure that this State will be prepared 20to and will adequately deal with any disasters, preserve the 21lives and property of the people of this State and protect the 22public peace, health, and safety in the event of a disaster, it   SB3659- 2 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1is found and declared to be necessary: 2        (1) To create a State emergency management and 3    homeland security agency an Illinois Emergency Management 4    Agency and to authorize emergency management programs 5    within the political subdivisions of the State. 6        (2) To confer upon the Governor and upon the principal 7    executive officer of the political subdivisions of the 8    State the powers provided herein. 9        (3) To provide for the rendering of mutual aid among 10    the political subdivisions and taxing districts of the 11    State and with other states and with respect to the 12    carrying out of an emergency management and homeland 13    security programs program.14    (b) It is further declared to be the purpose of this Act 15and the policy of the State that all emergency management and 16homeland security programs of this State be coordinated to the 17maximum extent with the comparable programs of the federal 18government, including its various departments and agencies, of 19other states and localities and private agencies of every 20type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use 21may be made of the nation's resources and facilities for 22dealing with any disaster that may occur.23(Source: P.A. 87-168; 88-606, eff. 1-1-95.) 24    (20 ILCS 3305/3)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1053)25    Sec. 3. Limitations. Nothing in this Act shall be   SB3659- 3 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1construed to:2    (a) Interfere with the course or conduct of a labor 3dispute, except that actions otherwise authorized by this Act 4or other laws may be taken when necessary to mitigate imminent 5or existing danger to public health or safety;6    (b) Interfere with dissemination of news or comment of 7public affairs; but any communications facility or 8organization (including but not limited to radio and 9television stations, wire services, and newspapers) may be 10requested to transmit or print public service messages 11furnishing information or instructions in connection with a 12disaster;13    (c) Affect the jurisdiction or responsibilities of police 14forces, fire fighting forces, units of the armed forces of the 15United States, or of any personnel thereof, when on active 16duty; but State and political subdivision emergency operations 17plans shall place reliance upon the forces available for 18performance of functions related to emergency management and 19homeland security;20    (d) Limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the 21Governor to proclaim martial law or exercise any other powers 22vested in the Governor under the constitution, statutes, or 23common law of this State, independent of or in conjunction 24with any provisions of this Act; limit any home rule unit; or 25prohibit any contract or association pursuant to Article VII, 26Section 10 of the Illinois Constitution.  SB3659- 4 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1(Source: P.A. 92-73, eff. 1-1-02.) 2    (20 ILCS 3305/4)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1054)3    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 4context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and 5terms have the meanings ascribed to them in this Section:6    "Coordinator" means the staff assistant to the principal 7executive officer of a political subdivision with the duty of 8coordinating the emergency management programs of that 9political subdivision.10    "Cyber incident" means an event occurring on or conducted 11through a computer network that actually or imminently 12jeopardizes the integrity, confidentiality, or availability of 13computers, information or communications systems or networks, 14physical or virtual infrastructure controlled by computers or 15information systems, or information resident thereon that 16affect or control infrastructure or communications networks 17utilized by the public. "Cyber incident" includes a 18vulnerability in information systems, system security 19procedures, internal controls, or implementations that could 20be exploited by a threat source that affect or control 21infrastructure or communications networks utilized by the 22public.23    "Disaster" means an occurrence or threat of widespread or 24severe damage, injury or loss of life or property resulting 25from any natural, technological, or human cause, including but   SB3659- 5 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1not limited to fire, flood, earthquake, wind, storm, hazardous 2materials spill or other water contamination requiring 3emergency action to avert danger or damage, epidemic, air 4contamination, blight, extended periods of severe and 5inclement weather, drought, infestation, critical shortages of 6essential fuels and energy, explosion, riot, hostile military 7or paramilitary action, public health emergencies, cyber 8incidents, or acts of domestic terrorism.9    "Emergency Management" means the efforts of the State and 10the political subdivisions to develop, plan, analyze, conduct, 11provide, implement and maintain programs for disaster 12mitigation, preparedness, response and recovery.13    "Emergency Services and Disaster Agency" means the agency 14by this name, by the name Emergency Management Agency, or by 15any other name that is established by ordinance within a 16political subdivision to coordinate the emergency management 17program within that political subdivision and with private 18organizations, other political subdivisions, the State and 19federal governments.20    "Emergency Operations Plan" means the written plan of the 21State and political subdivisions describing the organization, 22mission, and functions of the government and supporting 23services for responding to and recovering from disasters and 24shall include plans that take into account the needs of those 25individuals with household pets and service animals following 26a major disaster or emergency.  SB3659- 6 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    "Emergency Services" means the coordination of functions 2by the State and its political subdivisions subdivision, other 3than functions for which military forces are primarily 4responsible, as may be necessary or proper to prevent, 5minimize, repair, and alleviate injury and damage resulting 6from any natural or technological causes. These functions 7include, without limitation, fire fighting services, police 8services, emergency aviation services, medical and health 9services, HazMat and technical rescue teams, rescue, 10engineering, warning services, communications, radiological, 11chemical and other special weapons defense, evacuation of 12persons from stricken or threatened areas, emergency assigned 13functions of plant protection, temporary restoration of public 14utility services and other functions related to civilian 15protection, together with all other activities necessary or 16incidental to protecting life or property.17    "Exercise" means an event or activity delivered through 18discussion or action to develop, assess, or validate 19capabilities to achieve planned objectives a planned event 20realistically simulating a disaster, conducted for the purpose 21of evaluating the political subdivision's coordinated 22emergency management capabilities, including, but not limited 23to, testing the emergency operations plan.24    "HazMat team" means a career or volunteer mobile support 25team that has been authorized by a unit of local government to 26respond to hazardous materials emergencies and that is   SB3659- 7 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1primarily designed for emergency response to chemical or 2biological terrorism, radiological emergencies, hazardous 3material spills, releases, or fires, or other contamination 4events. 5    "Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 6Homeland Security" or "Agency" means the agency established by 7this Act within the executive branch of State Government 8responsible for coordination of the overall emergency 9management and homeland security programs program of the State 10and with private organizations, political subdivisions, and 11the federal government. Illinois Emergency Management Agency 12and Office of Homeland Security also means the State Emergency 13Response Commission responsible for the implementation of 14Title III of the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act 15of 1986.16    "Incident" means a disaster that does not rise to the 17level of a Governor-issued proclamation. 18    "Mobile Support Team" or "MST" means a group of 19individuals designated as a team by the Governor or Director 20to train prior to and to be activated, if the Governor or the 21Director so determines, to aid and reinforce the State and 22political subdivision emergency management efforts in response 23to an incident, disaster, federally declared national special 24security event, or other large public event.25    "Municipality" means any city, village, and incorporated 26town.  SB3659- 8 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    "Political Subdivision" means any county, city, village, 2or incorporated town or township if the township is in a county 3having a population of more than 2,000,000.4    "Principal Executive Officer" means chair of the county 5board, supervisor of a township if the township is in a county 6having a population of more than 2,000,000, mayor of a city or 7incorporated town, president of a village, or in their absence 8or disability, the interim successor as established under 9Section 7 of the Emergency Interim Executive Succession Act.10    "Public health emergency" means an occurrence or imminent 11threat of an illness or health condition that:12        (a) is believed to be caused by any of the following:13            (i) bioterrorism;14            (ii) the appearance of a novel or previously 15        controlled or eradicated infectious agent or 16        biological toxin;17            (iii) a natural disaster;18            (iv) a chemical attack or accidental release; or19            (v) a nuclear attack or accident; and20        (b) poses a high probability of any of the following 21    harms:22            (i) a large number of deaths in the affected 23        population;24            (ii) a large number of serious or long-term 25        disabilities in the affected population; or26            (iii) widespread exposure to an infectious or   SB3659- 9 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1        toxic agent that poses a significant risk of 2        substantial future harm to a large number of people in 3        the affected population.4    "Statewide mutual aid organization" means an entity with 5local government members throughout the State that facilitates 6temporary assistance through its members in a particular 7public safety discipline, such as police, fire or emergency 8management, when an occurrence exceeds a member jurisdiction's 9capabilities. 10    "Statewide Interoperability Coordinator" or "SWIC" means 11the position created in the Agency under Section 5.5 of this 12Act.13    "Technical rescue team" means a career or volunteer mobile 14support team that has been authorized by a unit of local 15government to respond to building collapse, high angle rescue, 16and other specialized rescue emergencies and that is primarily 17designated for emergency response to technical rescue events. 18(Source: P.A. 104-418, eff. 1-1-26.) 19    (20 ILCS 3305/5)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1055)20    Sec. 5. Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 21Homeland Security. 22    (a) There is created within the executive branch of the 23State Government an Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 24Office of Homeland Security and a Director of the Illinois 25Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security,   SB3659- 10 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1herein called the "Director" who shall be the head thereof. 2The Director shall be appointed by the Governor, with the 3advice and consent of the Senate, and shall serve for a term of 42 years beginning on the third Monday in January of the 5odd-numbered year, and until a successor is appointed and has 6qualified; except that the term of the first Director 7appointed under this Act shall expire on the third Monday in 8January, 1989. The Director shall not hold any other 9remunerative public office. For terms beginning after January 1018, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1179) and 11before January 16, 2023, the annual salary of the Director 12shall be as provided in Section 5-300 of the Civil 13Administrative Code of Illinois. Notwithstanding any other 14provision of law, for terms beginning on or after January 16, 152023, the Director shall receive an annual salary of $180,000 16or as set by the Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 172023, and on each July 1 thereafter, the Director shall 18receive an increase in salary based on a cost of living 19adjustment as authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 2086th General Assembly. 21    For terms beginning on or after January 16, 2023, the 22Assistant Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 23shall receive an annual salary of $156,600 or as set by the 24Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 2023, and on each 25July 1 thereafter, the Assistant Director shall receive an 26increase in salary based on a cost of living adjustment as   SB3659- 11 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General 2Assembly. 3    (b) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall obtain, 4under the provisions of the Personnel Code, technical, 5clerical, stenographic and other administrative personnel, and 6may make expenditures within the appropriation therefor as may 7be necessary to carry out the purpose of this Act. The agency 8created by this Act is intended to be a successor to the agency 9created under the Illinois Emergency Services and Disaster 10Agency Act of 1975 and the personnel, equipment, records, and 11appropriations of that agency are transferred to the successor 12agency as of June 30, 1988 (the effective date of this Act).13    (c) The Director, subject to the direction and control of 14the Governor, shall be the executive head of the Illinois 15Emergency Management Agency and the State Emergency Response 16Commission and shall be responsible under the direction of the 17Governor, for carrying out the programs program for emergency 18management, nuclear and radiation safety, and homeland 19security of this State. The Director shall also maintain 20liaison and cooperate with the emergency management, nuclear 21and radiation safety, and homeland security organizations of 22this State and other states and of the federal government.23    (d) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall take an 24integral part in the development and revision of political 25subdivision emergency operations plans prepared under 26paragraph (f) of Section 10. To this end it shall employ or   SB3659- 12 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1otherwise secure the services of professional and technical 2personnel capable of providing expert assistance to the 3emergency services and disaster agencies. These personnel 4shall consult with emergency services and disaster agencies on 5a regular basis and shall make field examinations of the 6areas, circumstances, and conditions that particular political 7subdivision emergency operations plans are intended to apply.8    (e) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and political 9subdivisions shall be encouraged to form an emergency 10management advisory committee composed of private and public 11personnel representing the emergency management phases of 12mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery. The Local 13Emergency Planning Committee, as created under the Illinois 14Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act, shall 15serve as an advisory committee to the emergency services and 16disaster agency or agencies serving within the boundaries of 17that Local Emergency Planning Committee planning district for:18        (1) the development of emergency operations plan 19    provisions for hazardous chemical emergencies; and20        (2) the assessment of emergency response capabilities 21    related to hazardous chemical emergencies.22    (f) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall:23        (1) Coordinate the overall emergency management, 24    nuclear and radiation safety, and homeland security 25    programs program of the State.26        (2) Cooperate with local governments, the federal   SB3659- 13 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    government, and any public or private agency or entity in 2    achieving any purpose of this Act and in implementing 3    emergency management programs for mitigation, 4    preparedness, response, and recovery.5        (2.5) Develop a comprehensive emergency preparedness 6    and response plan for any nuclear accident in accordance 7    with Section 65 of the Nuclear Safety Law of 2004 and in 8    development of the Illinois Nuclear Safety Preparedness 9    program in accordance with Section 8 of the Illinois 10    Nuclear Safety Preparedness Act.11        (2.6) Coordinate with the Department of Public Health 12    with respect to planning for and responding to public 13    health emergencies.14        (3) Prepare, for issuance by the Governor, executive 15    orders, proclamations, and regulations as necessary or 16    appropriate in coping with disasters.17        (4) Promulgate rules and requirements for political 18    subdivision emergency operations plans that are not 19    inconsistent with and are at least as stringent as 20    applicable federal laws and regulations.21        (5) Review and approve, in accordance with Illinois 22    Emergency Management Agency rules, emergency operations 23    plans for those political subdivisions required to have an 24    emergency services and disaster agency pursuant to this 25    Act.26        (5.5) Promulgate rules and requirements for the   SB3659- 14 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    political subdivision emergency management exercises, 2    including, but not limited to, exercises of the emergency 3    operations plans.4        (5.10) Review, evaluate, and approve, in accordance 5    with Illinois Emergency Management Agency rules, political 6    subdivision emergency management exercises for those 7    political subdivisions required to have an emergency 8    services and disaster agency pursuant to this Act.9        (6) Determine requirements of the State and its 10    political subdivisions for food, clothing, and other 11    necessities in event of a disaster.12        (7) Establish a register of persons with types of 13    emergency management training and skills in mitigation, 14    preparedness, response, and recovery. 15        (8) Establish a register of government and private 16    response resources available for use in a disaster.17        (9) Expand the Earthquake Awareness Program and its 18    efforts to distribute earthquake preparedness materials to 19    schools, political subdivisions, community groups, civic 20    organizations, and the media. Emphasis will be placed on 21    those areas of the State most at risk from an earthquake. 22    Maintain the list of all school districts, hospitals, 23    airports, power plants, including nuclear power plants, 24    lakes, dams, emergency response facilities of all types, 25    and all other major public or private structures which are 26    at the greatest risk of damage from earthquakes under   SB3659- 15 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    circumstances where the damage would cause subsequent harm 2    to the surrounding communities and residents.3        (10) Disseminate all information, completely and 4    without delay, on water levels for rivers and streams and 5    any other data pertaining to potential flooding supplied 6    by the Division of Water Resources within the Department 7    of Natural Resources to all political subdivisions to the 8    maximum extent possible.9        (11) Develop agreements, if feasible, with medical 10    supply and equipment firms to supply resources as are 11    necessary to respond to an earthquake or any other 12    disaster as defined in this Act. These resources will be 13    made available upon notifying the vendor of the disaster. 14    Payment for the resources will be in accordance with 15    Section 7 of this Act. The Illinois Department of Public 16    Health shall determine which resources will be required 17    and requested.18        (11.5) In coordination with the Illinois State Police, 19    develop and implement a community outreach program to 20    promote awareness among the State's parents and children 21    of child abduction prevention and response.22        (12) Out of funds appropriated for these purposes, 23    award capital and non-capital grants to Illinois hospitals 24    or health care facilities located outside of a city with a 25    population in excess of 1,000,000 to be used for purposes 26    that include, but are not limited to, preparing to respond   SB3659- 16 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    to mass casualties and disasters, maintaining and 2    improving patient safety and quality of care, and 3    protecting the confidentiality of patient information. No 4    single grant for a capital expenditure shall exceed 5    $300,000. No single grant for a non-capital expenditure 6    shall exceed $100,000. In awarding such grants, preference 7    shall be given to hospitals that serve a significant 8    number of Medicaid recipients, but do not qualify for 9    disproportionate share hospital adjustment payments under 10    the Illinois Public Aid Code. To receive such a grant, a 11    hospital or health care facility must provide funding of 12    at least 50% of the cost of the project for which the grant 13    is being requested. In awarding such grants the Illinois 14    Emergency Management Agency shall consider the 15    recommendations of the Illinois Hospital Association.16        (13) Do all other things necessary, incidental or 17    appropriate for the implementation of this Act.18    (g) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is authorized 19to make grants to various higher education institutions, 20public K-12 school districts, area vocational centers as 21designated by the State Board of Education, inter-district 22special education cooperatives, regional safe schools, and 23nonpublic K-12 schools for safety and security improvements. 24For the purpose of this subsection (g), "higher education 25institution" means a public university, a public community 26college, or an independent, not-for-profit or for-profit   SB3659- 17 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1higher education institution located in this State. Grants 2made under this subsection (g) shall be paid out of moneys 3appropriated for that purpose from the Build Illinois Bond 4Fund. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall adopt 5rules to implement this subsection (g). These rules may 6specify: (i) the manner of applying for grants; (ii) project 7eligibility requirements; (iii) restrictions on the use of 8grant moneys; (iv) the manner in which the various higher 9education institutions must account for the use of grant 10moneys; and (v) any other provision that the Illinois 11Emergency Management Agency determines to be necessary or 12useful for the administration of this subsection (g).13    (g-5) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is 14authorized to make grants to not-for-profit organizations 15which are exempt from federal income taxation under section 16501(c)(3) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code for eligible 17security improvements that assist the organization in 18preventing, preparing for, or responding to threats, attacks, 19or acts of terrorism. To be eligible for a grant under the 20program, the Agency must determine that the organization is at 21a high risk of being subject to threats, attacks, or acts of 22terrorism based on the organization's profile, ideology, 23mission, or beliefs. Eligible security improvements shall 24include all eligible preparedness activities under the federal 25Nonprofit Security Grant Program, including, but not limited 26to, physical security upgrades, security training exercises,   SB3659- 18 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1preparedness training exercises, contracting with security 2personnel, and any other security upgrades deemed eligible by 3the Director. Eligible security improvements shall not 4duplicate, in part or in whole, a project included under any 5awarded federal grant or in a pending federal application. The 6Director shall establish procedures and forms by which 7applicants may apply for a grant and procedures for 8distributing grants to recipients. Any security improvements 9awarded shall remain at the physical property listed in the 10grant application, unless authorized by Agency rule or 11approved by the Agency in writing. The procedures shall 12require each applicant to do the following:13        (1) identify and substantiate prior or current 14    threats, attacks, or acts of terrorism against the 15    not-for-profit organization;16        (2) indicate the symbolic or strategic value of one or 17    more sites that renders the site a possible target of a 18    threat, attack, or act of terrorism;19        (3) discuss potential consequences to the organization 20    if the site is damaged, destroyed, or disrupted by a 21    threat, attack, or act of terrorism;22        (4) describe how the grant will be used to integrate 23    organizational preparedness with broader State and local 24    preparedness efforts, as described by the Agency in each 25    Notice of Opportunity for Funding;26        (5) submit (i) a vulnerability assessment conducted by   SB3659- 19 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    experienced security, law enforcement, or military 2    personnel, or conducted using an Agency-approved or 3    federal Nonprofit Security Grant Program self-assessment 4    tool, and (ii) a description of how the grant award will be 5    used to address the vulnerabilities identified in the 6    assessment; and7        (6) submit any other relevant information as may be 8    required by the Director.9    The Agency is authorized to use funds appropriated for the 10grant program described in this subsection (g-5) to administer 11the program. Any Agency Notice of Opportunity for Funding, 12proposed or final rulemaking, guidance, training opportunity, 13or other resource related to the grant program must be 14published on the Agency's publicly available website, and any 15announcements related to funding shall be shared with all 16State legislative offices, the Governor's office, emergency 17services and disaster agencies mandated or required pursuant 18to subsections (b) through (d) of Section 10, and any other 19State agencies as determined by the Agency. Subject to 20appropriation, the grant application period shall be open for 21no less than 45 calendar days during the first application 22cycle each fiscal year, unless the Agency determines that a 23shorter period is necessary to avoid conflicts with the annual 24federal Nonprofit Security Grant Program funding cycle. 25Additional application cycles may be conducted during the same 26fiscal year, subject to availability of funds. Upon request,   SB3659- 20 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1Agency staff shall provide reasonable assistance to any 2applicant in completing a grant application or meeting a 3post-award requirement. 4    In addition to any advance payment rules or procedures 5adopted by the Agency, the Agency shall adopt rules or 6procedures by which grantees under this subsection (g-5) may 7receive a working capital advance of initial start-up costs 8and up to 2 months of program expenses, not to exceed 25% of 9the total award amount, if, during the application process, 10the grantee demonstrates a need for funds to commence a 11project. The remaining funds must be paid through 12reimbursement after the grantee presents sufficient supporting 13documentation of expenditures for eligible activities. 14    (h) Except as provided in Section 17.5 of this Act, any 15moneys received by the Agency from donations or sponsorships 16unrelated to a disaster shall be deposited in the Emergency 17Planning and Training Fund and used by the Agency, subject to 18appropriation, to effectuate planning and training activities. 19Any moneys received by the Agency from donations during a 20disaster and intended for disaster response or recovery shall 21be deposited into the Disaster Response and Recovery Fund and 22used for disaster response and recovery pursuant to the 23Disaster Relief Act. 24    (i) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency may by rule 25assess and collect reasonable fees for attendance at 26Agency-sponsored conferences to enable the Agency to carry out   SB3659- 21 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1the requirements of this Act. Any moneys received under this 2subsection shall be deposited in the Emergency Planning and 3Training Fund and used by the Agency, subject to 4appropriation, for planning and training activities.5    (j) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is authorized 6to make grants to other State agencies, public universities, 7units of local government, and statewide mutual aid 8organizations to enhance statewide emergency preparedness and 9response. 10    (k) Subject to appropriation from the Emergency Planning 11and Training Fund, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 12and Office of Homeland Security shall obtain training services 13and support for local emergency services and support for local 14emergency services and disaster agencies for training, 15exercises, and equipment related to carbon dioxide pipelines 16and sequestration, and, subject to the availability of 17funding, shall provide $5,000 per year to the Illinois Fire 18Service Institute for first responder training required under 19Section 4-615 of the Public Utilities Act. Amounts in the 20Emergency Planning and Training Fund will be used by the 21Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland 22Security for administrative costs incurred in carrying out the 23requirements of this subsection. To carry out the purposes of 24this subsection, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 25Office of Homeland Security may accept moneys from all 26authorized sources into the Emergency Planning and Training   SB3659- 22 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1Fund, including, but not limited to, transfers from the Carbon 2Dioxide Sequestration Administrative Fund and the Public 3Utility Fund. 4    (l) The Agency shall do all other things necessary, 5incidental, or appropriate for the implementation of this Act, 6including the adoption of rules in accordance with the 7Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 8(Source: P.A. 103-418, eff. 1-1-24; 103-588, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-651, eff. 7-18-24; 103-999, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 108-15-25.) 11    (20 ILCS 3305/5.5 new)12    Sec. 5.5. Statewide Interoperability Coordinator (SWIC).13    (a) The Statewide Interoperability Coordinator (SWIC) is 14hereby created as a position within the Agency.15    (b) The SWIC shall:16        (1) act as the senior advisor and central coordination 17    point for public safety communications efforts and serves 18    as the principal policy making authority for public safety 19    interoperable communications statewide;20        (2) plan and implement the statewide interoperability 21    program, guided by initiatives outlined in the National 22    Emergency Communication Plan and Statewide Communications 23    Interoperability Plan;24        (3) ascertain what means exist for rapid and efficient 25    communications in times of disaster;  SB3659- 23 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1        (4) serve as the central coordination point for the 2    State's communications interoperability as well as the 3    Single Point of Contact for the First Responder Network 4    Authority and assist with mediation to achieve an 5    interoperable communications ecosystem;6        (5) coordinate with all emergency response leaders 7    within State agencies, public jurisdictions, the federal 8    government, and private entities to implement and maintain 9    the state's strategic vision for interoperability to 10    ensure emergency readiness;11        (6) coordinate governing body activities to maximize 12    integration and collaboration across the emergency 13    communications landscape and serve as a member of the 14    Statewide Interoperability Executive Committee or its 15    successor entity and may act on behalf of the Statewide 16    Interoperability Executive Committee;17        (7) recommend regulatory changes relating to public 18    safety communications and interoperability activities 19    statewide;20        (8) on behalf of the State, serve as the point of 21    contact for the federal government and industry on issues 22    concerning statewide interoperable communications;23        (9) ensure federal funding for emergency 24    communications initiatives are coordinated, align to the 25    National Emergency Communication Plan and Statewide 26    Communications Interoperability Plan, and are compatible   SB3659- 24 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    with surrounding systems;2        (10) represent the State in national, regional, and 3    local efforts to plan and implement changes needed to 4    achieve interoperability and continuity of communications 5    for emergency responders;6        (11) ensure a comprehensive approach to public safety 7    communications and cybersecurity across all technologies; 8    and9        (12) support operational communications by regularly 10    coordinating, planning, and communicating with relevant 11    industry, communications providers, and other 12    stakeholders. 13    (20 ILCS 3305/6)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1056)14    Sec. 6. Emergency Management Powers of the Governor. 15    (a) The Governor shall have general direction and control 16of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and shall be 17responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of this 18Act.19    (b) In performing duties under this Act, the Governor is 20authorized to cooperate with the federal government and with 21other states in all matters pertaining to emergency 22management, nuclear and radiation safety, and homeland 23security.24    (c) In performing duties under this Act, the Governor is 25further authorized:  SB3659- 25 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1        (1) To make, amend, and rescind all lawful necessary 2    orders, rules, and regulations to carry out the provisions 3    of this Act within the limits of the authority conferred 4    upon the Governor.5        (2) To cause to be prepared a comprehensive plan and 6    programs program for the emergency management, nuclear and 7    radiation safety, and homeland security of this State, 8    which plan and program shall be integrated into and 9    coordinated with emergency management, nuclear and 10    radiation safety, and homeland security plans and programs 11    of the federal government and of other states whenever 12    possible and which plan and program may include:13            a. Mitigation of injury and damage caused by 14        disaster.15            b. Prompt and effective response to disaster.16            c. Emergency relief.17            d. Identification of areas particularly vulnerable 18        to disasters.19            e. Recommendations for zoning, building, and other 20        land-use controls, safety measures for securing 21        permanent structures and other mitigation measures 22        designed to eliminate or reduce disasters or their 23        impact.24            f. Assistance to political subdivisions in 25        designing emergency operations plans.26            g. Authorization and procedures for the erection   SB3659- 26 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1        or other construction of temporary works designed to 2        mitigate danger, damage or loss from flood, or other 3        disaster.4            h. Preparation and distribution to the appropriate 5        State and political subdivision officials of a State 6        catalog of federal, State, and private assistance 7        programs.8            i. Organization of State personnel and chains of 9        command.10            j. Coordination of federal, State, and political 11        subdivision emergency management, nuclear and 12        radiation safety, and homeland security activities.13            k. Other necessary matters.14        (3) In accordance with the plans and programs plan and 15    program for the emergency management, nuclear and 16    radiation safety, and homeland security of this State, and 17    out of funds appropriated for these purposes, to procure 18    and preposition supplies, medicines, materials and 19    equipment, to institute training programs and public 20    information programs, and to take all other preparatory 21    steps including the partial or full mobilization of MSTs 22    and emergency services and disaster agencies to insure the 23    furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces for 24    incidents, disasters, federally declared national special 25    security events, and other large public events.26        (4) Out of funds appropriated for these purposes, to   SB3659- 27 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    make studies and surveys of the industries, resources, and 2    facilities in this State as may be necessary to ascertain 3    the capabilities of the State for emergency management 4    phases of mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery 5    and to plan for the most efficient emergency use thereof.6        (5) On behalf of this State, to negotiate for and 7    submit to the General Assembly for its approval or 8    rejection reciprocal mutual aid agreements or compacts 9    with other states, either on a statewide or political 10    subdivision basis. The agreements or compacts, shall be 11    limited to the furnishing or exchange of food, clothing, 12    medical or other supplies, engineering and police 13    services; emergency housing and feeding; National and 14    State Guards while under the control of the State; health, 15    medical, and related services; fire fighting, rescue, 16    transportation, communication, and construction services 17    and equipment, provided, however, that if the General 18    Assembly be not in session and the Governor has not 19    proclaimed the existence of a disaster under this Section, 20    then the agreements or compacts shall instead be submitted 21    to an Interim Committee on Emergency Management composed 22    of 5 Senators appointed by the President of the Senate and 23    of 5 Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the 24    House, during the month of June of each odd-numbered year 25    to serve for a 2 year term, beginning July 1 of that year, 26    and until their successors are appointed and qualified, or   SB3659- 28 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    until termination of their legislative service, whichever 2    first occurs. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for 3    the unexpired term in the same manner as original 4    appointments. All appointments shall be made in writing 5    and filed with the Secretary of State as a public record. 6    The Committee shall have the power to approve or reject 7    any agreements or compacts for and on behalf of the 8    General Assembly; and, provided further, that an 9    affirmative vote of 2/3 of the members of the Committee 10    shall be necessary for the approval of any agreement or 11    compact.12(Source: P.A. 104-418, eff. 1-1-26.) 13    (20 ILCS 3305/7)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1057)14    Sec. 7. Emergency Powers of the Governor. In the event of a 15disaster, as defined in Section 4, the Governor may, by 16proclamation declare that a disaster exists. Upon such 17proclamation, the Governor shall have and may exercise for a 18period not to exceed 30 days the following emergency powers; 19provided, however, that the lapse of the emergency powers 20shall not, as regards any act or acts occurring or committed 21within the 30-day period, deprive any person, firm, 22corporation, political subdivision, or body politic of any 23right or rights to compensation or reimbursement which he, 24she, it, or they may have under the provisions of this Act:25        (1) To suspend the provisions of any regulatory   SB3659- 29 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    statute prescribing procedures for conduct of State 2    business, or the orders, rules and regulations of any 3    State agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of 4    any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way 5    prevent, hinder or delay necessary action, including 6    emergency purchases, by the Illinois Emergency Management 7    Agency, in coping with the disaster.8        (2) To utilize all available resources of the State 9    government as reasonably necessary to cope with the 10    disaster and of each political subdivision of the State.11        (3) To transfer the direction, personnel or functions 12    of State departments and agencies or units thereof for the 13    purpose of performing or facilitating disaster response 14    and recovery programs.15        (4) On behalf of this State to take possession of, and 16    to acquire full title or a lesser specified interest in, 17    any personal property as may be necessary to accomplish 18    the objectives set forth in Section 2 of this Act, 19    including: airplanes, automobiles, trucks, trailers, 20    buses, and other vehicles; coal, oils, gasoline, and other 21    fuels and means of propulsion; explosives, materials, 22    equipment, and supplies; animals and livestock; feed and 23    seed; food and provisions for humans and animals; clothing 24    and bedding; and medicines and medical and surgical 25    supplies; and to take possession of and for a limited 26    period occupy and use any real estate necessary to   SB3659- 30 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    accomplish those objectives; but only upon the undertaking 2    by the State to pay just compensation therefor as in this 3    Act provided, and then only under the following 4    provisions:5            a. The Governor, or the person or persons as the 6        Governor may authorize so to do, may forthwith take 7        possession of property for and on behalf of the State; 8        provided, however, that the Governor or persons shall 9        simultaneously with the taking, deliver to the owner 10        or his or her agent, if the identity of the owner or 11        agency is known or readily ascertainable, a signed 12        statement in writing, that shall include the name and 13        address of the owner, the date and place of the taking, 14        description of the property sufficient to identify it, 15        a statement of interest in the property that is being 16        so taken, and, if possible, a statement in writing, 17        signed by the owner, setting forth the sum that he or 18        she is willing to accept as just compensation for the 19        property or use. Whether or not the owner or agent is 20        known or readily ascertainable, a true copy of the 21        statement shall promptly be filed by the Governor or 22        the person with the Director, who shall keep the 23        docket of the statements. In cases where the sum that 24        the owner is willing to accept as just compensation is 25        less than $1,000, copies of the statements shall also 26        be filed by the Director with, and shall be passed upon   SB3659- 31 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1        by an Emergency Management Claims Commission, 2        consisting of 3 disinterested citizens who shall be 3        appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and 4        consent of the Senate, within 20 days after the 5        Governor's declaration of a disaster, and if the sum 6        fixed by them as just compensation be less than $1,000 7        and is accepted in writing by the owner, then the State 8        Treasurer out of funds appropriated for these 9        purposes, shall, upon certification thereof by the 10        Emergency Management Claims Commission, cause the sum 11        so certified forthwith to be paid to the owner. The 12        Emergency Management Claims Commission is hereby given 13        the power to issue appropriate subpoenas and to 14        administer oaths to witnesses and shall keep 15        appropriate minutes and other records of its actions 16        upon and the disposition made of all claims.17            b. When the compensation to be paid for the taking 18        or use of property or interest therein is not or cannot 19        be determined and paid under item a of this paragraph 20        (4), a petition in the name of The People of the State 21        of Illinois shall be promptly filed by the Director, 22        which filing may be enforced by mandamus, in the 23        circuit court of the county where the property or any 24        part thereof was located when initially taken or used 25        under the provisions of this Act praying that the 26        amount of compensation to be paid to the person or   SB3659- 32 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1        persons interested therein be fixed and determined. 2        The petition shall include a description of the 3        property that has been taken, shall state the physical 4        condition of the property when taken, shall name as 5        defendants all interested parties, shall set forth the 6        sum of money estimated to be just compensation for the 7        property or interest therein taken or used, and shall 8        be signed by the Director. The litigation shall be 9        handled by the Attorney General for and on behalf of 10        the State.11            c. Just compensation for the taking or use of 12        property or interest therein shall be promptly 13        ascertained in proceedings and established by judgment 14        against the State, that shall include, as part of the 15        just compensation so awarded, interest at the rate of 16        6% per annum on the fair market value of the property 17        or interest therein from the date of the taking or use 18        to the date of the judgment; and the court may order 19        the payment of delinquent taxes and special 20        assessments out of the amount so awarded as just 21        compensation and may make any other orders with 22        respect to encumbrances, rents, insurance, and other 23        charges, if any, as shall be just and equitable.24        (5) When required by the exigencies of the disaster, 25    to sell, lend, rent, give, or distribute all or any part of 26    property so or otherwise acquired to the inhabitants of   SB3659- 33 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    this State, or to political subdivisions of this State, 2    or, under the interstate mutual aid agreements or compacts 3    as are entered into under the provisions of subparagraph 4    (5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6 to other states, and to 5    account for and transmit to the State Treasurer all funds, 6    if any, received therefor.7        (6) To recommend the evacuation of all or part of the 8    population from any stricken or threatened area within the 9    State if the Governor deems this action necessary.10        (7) To prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and 11    destinations in connection with evacuation.12        (8) To control ingress and egress to and from a 13    disaster area, the movement of persons within the area, 14    and the occupancy of premises therein.15        (9) To suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or 16    transportation of alcoholic beverages, firearms, 17    explosives, and combustibles.18        (10) To make provision for the availability and use of 19    temporary emergency housing.20        (11) A proclamation of a disaster shall activate the 21    State Emergency Operations Plan, and political subdivision 22    emergency operations plans applicable to the political 23    subdivision or area in question and be authority for the 24    deployment and use of any forces that the plan or plans 25    apply and for use or distribution of any supplies, 26    equipment, and materials and facilities assembled,   SB3659- 34 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    stockpiled or arranged to be made available under this Act 2    or any other provision of law relating to disasters.3        (12) Control, restrict, and regulate by rationing, 4    freezing, use of quotas, prohibitions on shipments, price 5    fixing, allocation or other means, the use, sale or 6    distribution of food, feed, fuel, clothing and other 7    commodities, materials, goods, or services; and perform 8    and exercise any other functions, powers, and duties as 9    may be necessary to promote and secure the safety and 10    protection of the civilian population.11        (13) During the continuance of any disaster the 12    Governor is commander-in-chief of the organized and 13    unorganized militia and of all other forces available for 14    emergency duty. To the greatest extent practicable, the 15    Governor shall delegate or assign authority to the 16    Director to manage, coordinate, and direct all resources 17    by orders issued at the time of the disaster.18        (14) Prohibit increases in the prices of goods and 19    services during a disaster.20(Source: P.A. 102-485, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    (20 ILCS 3305/8)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1058)22    Sec. 8. Mobile support teams; mutual aid. 23    (a) The Governor or Director, on behalf of the Governor, 24may enter into agreements with local governments, the federal 25government, tribal governments, and any public or private   SB3659- 35 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this Act and in 2implementing emergency management programs for mitigation, 3preparedness, response, and recovery. 4    (b) The Governor or Director may activate mobile support 5teams (MSTs) to aid and reinforce the Illinois Emergency 6Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, and 7emergency services and disaster agencies in this State or 8out-of-state pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance 9Compact, as ratified in the Emergency Management Assistance 10Compact Act, for incidents, disasters, federally declared 11national special security events, and other large public 12events. 13    (c) Each mobile support team shall have a leader or 14leadership group, who will be responsible for the 15organization, administration, training, and general operation 16of the mobile support team.17    (d) While activated on behalf of the State, the MST shall 18report to the Director or designee as the Director retains 19operational control of MSTs even if they have been tasked to 20support emergency services and disaster agencies. 21    (e) Personnel of an MST while activated by the Governor or 22Director or while engaged in State-approved or State-sponsored 23training or exercises, whether within or without the State, 24shall:25        (1) If they are paid employees of the State, have the 26    powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and   SB3659- 36 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    receive the compensation incidental to their employment.2        (2) If they are paid employees of a political 3    subdivision or body politic of this State, and whether 4    serving within or without that political subdivision or 5    body politic, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges 6    and immunities, and receive the compensation incidental to 7    their employment.8        (3) If they are not employees of the State, political 9    subdivision or body politic, or being such employees, are 10    not normally paid for their services, be entitled to at 11    least one dollar per year compensation from the State.12    (f) All personnel of MSTs may, while activated by the 13Governor or Director, be reimbursed by this State for all 14actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses related 15to their activation. 16    (g) Personnel of a mobile support team who suffer disease, 17injury or death, while activated by the Governor or Director, 18shall for the purposes of benefits under the Workers' 19Compensation Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases Act only, 20be deemed to be employees of this State. If the person 21diseased, injured or killed is an employee described in item 22(3) of subsection (e), the computation of benefits payable 23under either of those Acts shall be based on income 24commensurate with comparable State employees doing the same 25type of work or income from the person's regular employment, 26whichever is greater.  SB3659- 37 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    (h) In lieu of subsection (f), the State may, by 2agreement, reimburse each political subdivision or body 3politic from the Disaster Response and Recovery Fund, or from 4other funding determined by the State, for the compensation 5paid and the actual and necessary travel and subsistence 6expenses of paid employees of the political subdivision or 7body politic while serving, outside of its geographical 8boundaries on behalf of the State, as members of an MST, and 9for all payments made for death, disease or injury of those 10paid employees arising out of and incurred in the course of 11that duty, and for all losses of or damage to supplies and 12equipment of the political subdivision or body politic 13resulting from the operations.14    (i) Whenever activated MSTs or units of another state 15operating under orders of the Governor of their home state, 16render aid to this State, all questions relating to 17reimbursement by this State in regard to the assistance 18rendered shall be determined by the mutual aid agreements, MST 19agreements, or interstate compacts described in subparagraph 20(5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6 as are existing at the time 21of the assistance rendered, pursuant to the Emergency 22Management Assistance Compact as ratified in the Emergency 23Management Assistance Compact Act, as are entered into 24thereafter.25    (j) No personnel of MSTs of this State may be ordered by 26the Governor or Director to operate in any other state unless a   SB3659- 38 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1request for the same has been made by the Governor or duly 2authorized representative of the other state pursuant to the 3Emergency Management Assistance Compact, as ratified in the 4Emergency Management Assistance Compact Act, or a successor 5law.6    (k) All expenses and compensation reimbursed under this 7Section may be provided from the Disaster Response and 8Recovery Fund or other funding determined by the State. The 9mutual aid agreement shall specify the manner and method in 10which compensation shall be paid. 11(Source: P.A. 104-418, eff. 1-1-26.) 12    (20 ILCS 3305/10)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1060)13    Sec. 10. Emergency Services and Disaster Agencies. 14    (a) Each political subdivision within this State shall be 15within the jurisdiction of and served by the Illinois 16Emergency Management Agency and by an emergency services and 17disaster agency responsible for emergency management programs. 18A township, if the township is in a county having a population 19of more than 2,000,000, must have approval of the county 20coordinator before establishment of a township emergency 21services and disaster agency.22    (b) Unless multiple county emergency services and disaster 23agency consolidation is authorized by the Illinois Emergency 24Management Agency with the consent of the respective counties, 25each county shall maintain an emergency services and disaster   SB3659- 39 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1agency that has jurisdiction over and serves the entire 2county, except as otherwise provided under this Act and except 3that in any county with a population of over 3,000,000 4containing a municipality with a population of over 500,000 5the jurisdiction of the county agency shall not extend to the 6municipality when the municipality has established its own 7agency.8    (c) Each municipality with a population of over 500,000 9shall maintain an emergency services and disaster agency which 10has jurisdiction over and serves the entire municipality. A 11municipality with a population less than 500,000 may 12establish, by ordinance, an agency or department responsible 13for emergency management within the municipality's corporate 14limits.15    (d) The Governor shall determine which municipal 16corporations, other than those specified in paragraph (c) of 17this Section, need emergency services and disaster agencies of 18their own and require that they be established and maintained. 19The Governor shall make these determinations on the basis of 20the municipality's disaster vulnerability and capability of 21response related to population size and concentration. The 22emergency services and disaster agency of a county or 23township, shall not have a jurisdiction within a political 24subdivision having its own emergency services and disaster 25agency, but shall cooperate with the emergency services and 26disaster agency of a city, village or incorporated town within   SB3659- 40 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1their borders. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall 2publish and furnish a current list to the municipalities 3required to have an emergency services and disaster agency 4under this subsection.5    (e) Each municipality that is not required to and does not 6have an emergency services and disaster agency shall have a 7liaison officer designated to facilitate the cooperation and 8protection of that municipal corporation with the county 9emergency services and disaster agency in which it is located 10in the work of disaster mitigation, preparedness, response, 11and recovery.12    (f) The principal executive officer or his or her designee 13of each political subdivision in the State shall annually 14notify the Illinois Emergency Management Agency of the manner 15in which the political subdivision is providing or securing 16emergency management, identify the executive head of the 17agency or the department from which the service is obtained, 18or the liaison officer in accordance with subsection (e) 19paragraph (d) of this Section and furnish additional 20information relating thereto as the Illinois Emergency 21Management Agency requires.22    (g) Each emergency services and disaster agency shall 23prepare an emergency operations plan for its geographic 24boundaries that complies with planning, review, and approval 25standards promulgated by the Illinois Emergency Management 26Agency. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall   SB3659- 41 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1determine which jurisdictions will be required to include 2earthquake preparedness in their local emergency operations 3plans.4    (h) The emergency services and disaster agency shall 5prepare and distribute to all appropriate officials in written 6form a clear and complete statement of the emergency 7responsibilities of all local departments and officials and of 8the disaster chain of command.9    (i) Each emergency services and disaster agency shall have 10a Coordinator who shall be appointed by the principal 11executive officer of the political subdivision in the same 12manner as are the heads of regular governmental departments. 13If the political subdivision is a county and the principal 14executive officer appoints the sheriff as the Coordinator, the 15sheriff may, in addition to his or her regular compensation, 16receive compensation at the same level as provided in Article 173 of the Counties Code Section 3 of "An Act in relation to the 18regulation of motor vehicle traffic and the promotion of 19safety on public highways in counties", approved August 9, 201951, as amended. The Coordinator shall have direct 21responsibility for the organization, administration, training, 22and operation of the emergency services and disaster agency, 23subject to the direction and control of that principal 24executive officer. Each emergency services and disaster agency 25shall coordinate and may perform emergency management 26functions within the territorial limits of the political   SB3659- 42 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1subdivision within which it is organized as are prescribed in 2and by the State Emergency Operations Plan, and programs, 3orders, rules and regulations as may be promulgated by the 4Illinois Emergency Management Agency and by local ordinance 5and, in addition, shall conduct such functions outside of 6those territorial limits as may be required under mutual aid 7agreements and compacts as are entered into under subparagraph 8(5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6.9    (j) In carrying out the provisions of this Act, each 10political subdivision may enter into contracts and incur 11obligations necessary to place it in a position effectively to 12combat the disasters as are described in Section 4, to protect 13the health and safety of persons, to protect property, and to 14provide emergency assistance to victims of those disasters. If 15a disaster occurs, each political subdivision may exercise the 16powers vested under this Section in the light of the 17exigencies of the disaster and, excepting mandatory 18constitutional requirements, without regard to the procedures 19and formalities normally prescribed by law pertaining to the 20performance of public work, entering into contracts, the 21incurring of obligations, the employment of temporary workers, 22the rental of equipment, the purchase of supplies and 23materials, and the appropriation, expenditure, and disposition 24of public funds and property.25    (k) Volunteers who, while engaged in a disaster, an 26exercise, training related to the emergency operations plan of   SB3659- 43 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1the political subdivision, or a search-and-rescue team 2response to an occurrence or threat of injury or loss of life 3that is beyond local response capabilities, suffer disease, 4injury or death, shall, for the purposes of benefits under the 5Workers' Compensation Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases 6Act only, be deemed to be employees of the State, if: (1) the 7claimant is a duly qualified and enrolled (sworn in) as a 8volunteer of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency or an 9emergency services and disaster agency accredited by the 10Illinois Emergency Management Agency, and (2) if: (i) the 11claimant was participating in a disaster as defined in Section 124 of this Act, (ii) the exercise or training participated in 13was specifically and expressly approved by the Illinois 14Emergency Management Agency prior to the exercise or training, 15or (iii) the search-and-rescue team response was to an 16occurrence or threat of injury or loss of life that was beyond 17local response capabilities and was specifically and expressly 18approved by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency prior to 19the search-and-rescue team response. The computation of 20benefits payable under either of those Acts shall be based on 21the income commensurate with comparable State employees doing 22the same type work or income from the person's regular 23employment, whichever is greater.24    Volunteers who are working under the direction of an 25emergency services and disaster agency accredited by the 26Illinois Emergency Management Agency, pursuant to a plan   SB3659- 44 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1approved by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency (i) 2during a disaster declared by the Governor under Section 7 of 3this Act, or (ii) in circumstances otherwise expressly 4approved by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency, shall be 5deemed exclusively employees of the State for purposes of 6Section 8(d) of the Court of Claims Act, provided that the 7Illinois Emergency Management Agency may, in coordination with 8the emergency services and disaster agency, audit 9implementation for compliance with the plan. 10    (l) If any person who is entitled to receive benefits 11through the application of this Section receives, in 12connection with the disease, injury or death giving rise to 13such entitlement, benefits under an Act of Congress or federal 14program, benefits payable under this Section shall be reduced 15to the extent of the benefits received under that other Act or 16program. 17    (m) (1) Prior to conducting an exercise, the principal 18    executive officer of a political subdivision or his or her 19    designee shall provide area media with written 20    notification of the exercise. The notification shall 21    indicate that information relating to the exercise shall 22    not be released to the public until the commencement of 23    the exercise. The notification shall also contain a 24    request that the notice be so posted to ensure that all 25    relevant media personnel are advised of the exercise 26    before it begins.   SB3659- 45 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1        (2) During the conduct of an exercise, all messages, 2    two-way radio communications, briefings, status reports, 3    news releases, and other oral or written communications 4    shall begin and end with the following statement: "This is 5    an exercise message".6(Source: P.A. 94-733, eff. 4-27-06.) 7    (20 ILCS 3305/12)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1062)8    Sec. 12. Testing of Disaster Warning Devices. The testing 9of disaster warning devices including outdoor warning sirens 10shall be held only on the first Tuesday of each month at 10 11o'clock in the morning or during exercises that are 12specifically and expressly approved in advance by the Illinois 13Emergency Management Agency.14(Source: P.A. 92-73, eff. 1-1-02.) 15    (20 ILCS 3305/14)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1064)16    Sec. 14. Communications. The Illinois Emergency Management 17Agency shall ascertain what means exist for rapid and 18efficient communications in times of disaster. The Illinois 19Emergency Management Agency shall consider the desirability of 20supplementing these communications resources or of integrating 21them into a comprehensive State or State-Federal 22telecommunications or other communications system or network. 23In studying the character and feasibility of any system or its 24several parts, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall   SB3659- 46 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1evaluate the possibility of multipurpose use thereof for 2general State and political subdivision purposes. The Illinois 3Emergency Management Agency may promulgate rules to establish 4policies and procedures relating to telecommunications and the 5continuation of rapid and efficient communications in times of 6disaster to the extent authorized by any provision of this Act 7or other laws and regulations. The Illinois Emergency 8Management Agency shall make recommendations to the Governor 9as appropriate.10(Source: P.A. 86-755; 87-168.) 11    (20 ILCS 3305/18)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1068)12    Sec. 18. Orders, Rules and Regulations. 13    (a) The Governor shall file a copy of every rule, 14regulation or order, and any amendment thereof made by the 15Governor under the provisions of this Act in the office of the 16Secretary of State. Upon No rule, regulation or order, or any 17amendment thereof shall be effective until 10 days after the 18filing, provided, however, that upon the declaration of a 19disaster by the Governor as is described in Section 7 the 20provision relating to the effective date of any rule, 21regulation, order or amendment issued under this Act and 22during the state of disaster is abrogated, and the rule, 23regulation, order or amendment shall become effective 24immediately upon being filed with the Secretary of State 25accompanied by a certificate stating the reason as required by   SB3659- 47 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.2    (b) Every emergency services and disaster agency 3established pursuant to this Act and the coordinators thereof 4shall execute and enforce the orders, rules and regulations as 5may be made by the Governor under authority of this Act. Each 6emergency services and disaster agency shall have available 7for inspection at its office all orders, rules and regulations 8made by the Governor, or under the Governor's authority. The 9Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall publish furnish on 10the Agency's Department's website the orders, rules and 11regulations to each such emergency services and disaster 12agency. Upon the written request of an emergency services or 13disaster agency, copies thereof shall be mailed to the 14emergency services or disaster agency. 15(Source: P.A. 98-44, eff. 6-28-13.) 16    (20 ILCS 3305/20)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1070)17    Sec. 20. Oath. 18    (a) Each person, whether compensated or noncompensated, 19who is appointed to serve in any capacity in, or on behalf of, 20the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 21Homeland Security (IEMA-OHS) or an emergency services and 22disaster agency, shall, before entering upon duties, take an 23oath in writing. 24    (b) The oath shall be administered before the Director of 25IEMA-OHS (or a designee authorized in writing by the   SB3659- 48 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1Director), the coordinator of the respective emergency 2services and disaster agency, or persons authorized to 3administer oaths in this State pursuant to the Oaths an 4Affirmations Act. 5    The oath may be administered through live video technology 6or other electronic means; however, the signed oath shall be 7filed with IEMA-OHS or with the emergency services and 8disaster agency with which the person shall serve and which 9oath shall be substantially as follows:10    "I, _______________, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I 11will support and defend and bear true faith and allegiance to 12the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of 13the State of Illinois, and the territory, institutions and 14facilities thereof, both public and private, against all 15enemies, foreign and domestic; that I take this obligation 16freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; 17and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties upon 18which I am about to enter. And I do further swear (or affirm) 19that I do not advocate, nor am I, nor have I been a member of 20any political party or organization that advocates the 21overthrow of the government of the United States or of this 22State by force or violence; and that during such time as I am 23affiliated with the (name of emergency preparedness 24organization), I will not advocate nor become a member or an 25affiliate of any organization, group, or combination of 26persons that advocates the overthrow of the government of the   SB3659- 49 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1United States or of this State by force or violence."2(Source: P.A. 104-418, eff. 1-1-26.) 3    (20 ILCS 3305/23)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2032)5    Sec. 23. Access and Functional Needs Advisory Committee.6    (a) In this Section, "Advisory Committee" means the Access 7and Functional Needs Advisory Committee.8    (b) The Access and Functional Needs Advisory Committee is 9created.10    (c) The Advisory Committee shall:11        (1) Coordinate meetings occurring, at a minimum, 3 12    times each year, in addition to emergency meetings called 13    by the chairperson of the Advisory Committee.14        (2) Research and provide recommendations for 15    identifying and effectively responding to the needs of 16    persons with access and functional needs before, during, 17    and after a disaster using an intersectional lens for 18    equity.19        (3) Provide recommendations to the Illinois Emergency 20    Management Agency regarding how to ensure that persons 21    with a disability are included in disaster strategies and 22    emergency management plans, including updates and 23    implementation of disaster strategies and emergency 24    management plans.25        (4) Review and provide recommendations for the   SB3659- 50 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    Illinois Emergency Management Agency, and all relevant 2    State agencies that are involved in drafting and 3    implementing the Illinois Emergency Operation Plan, to 4    integrate access and functional needs into State and local 5    emergency operations plans.6    (d) The Advisory Committee shall be composed of the 7Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency or his or 8her designee, the Attorney General or his or her designee, the 9Secretary of Human Services or his or her designee, the 10Director of Aging or his or her designee, and the Director of 11Public Health or his or her designee, together with the 12following members appointed by the Governor on or before 13January 1, 2022:14        (1) Two members, either from a municipal or 15    county-level emergency agency or a local emergency 16    management coordinator.17        (2) Nine members from the community of persons with a 18    disability who represent persons with different types of 19    disabilities, including, but not limited to, individuals 20    with mobility and physical disabilities, hearing and 21    visual disabilities, deafness or who are hard of hearing, 22    blindness or who have low vision, mental health 23    disabilities, and intellectual or developmental 24    disabilities. Members appointed under this paragraph shall 25    reflect a diversity of age, gender, race, and ethnic 26    background.  SB3659- 51 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1        (3) Four members who represent first responders from 2    different geographical regions around the State.3    (e) Of those members appointed by the Governor, the 4initial appointments of 6 members shall be for terms of 2 years 5and the initial appointments of 5 members shall be for terms of 64 years. Thereafter, members shall be appointed for terms of 4 7years. A member shall serve until his or her successor is 8appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs in the Advisory 9Committee membership, the vacancy shall be filled in the same 10manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the 11unexpired term. 12    (f) After all the members are appointed, and annually 13thereafter, they shall elect a chairperson from among the 14members appointed under paragraph (2) of subsection (d).15    (g) (Blank). The initial meeting of the Advisory Committee 16shall be convened by the Director of the Illinois Emergency 17Management Agency no later than February 1, 2022.18    (h) Advisory Committee members shall serve without 19compensation.20    (i) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall provide 21administrative support to the Advisory Committee.22    (j) The Advisory Committee shall prepare and deliver a 23report to the General Assembly, the Governor's Office, and the 24Illinois Emergency Management Agency by July 1, 2022, and 25annually thereafter. The report shall include the following:26        (1) Identification of core emergency management   SB3659- 52 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    services that need to be updated or changed to ensure the 2    needs of persons with a disability are met, and shall 3    include disaster strategies in State and local emergency 4    plans.5        (2) Any proposed changes in State policies, laws, 6    rules, or regulations necessary to fulfill the purposes of 7    this Act.8        (3) Recommendations on improving the accessibility and 9    effectiveness of disaster and emergency communication.10        (4) Recommendations on comprehensive training for 11    first responders and other frontline workers when working 12    with persons with a disability during emergency situations 13    or disasters, as defined in Section 4 of the Illinois 14    Emergency Management Agency Act.15        (5) Any additional recommendations regarding emergency 16    management and persons with a disability that the Advisory 17    Committee deems necessary.18    (k) The annual report prepared and delivered under 19subsection (j) shall be annually considered by the Illinois 20Emergency Management Agency when developing new State and 21local emergency plans or updating existing State and local 22emergency plans.23    (l) The Advisory Committee is dissolved and this Section 24is repealed on January 1, 2032.25(Source: P.A. 102-361, eff. 8-13-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 26103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)   SB3659- 53 -LRB104 18339 BDA 31779 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.